District of Columbia statutes.
Transferred

10-1212

Duties and responsibilities.

Recodified as § 10-1272 [repealed]

Nov. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 3-36, § 4, 26 DCR 1439
Dec. 21, 1985, D.C. Law 6-74, § 3(b), 32 DCR 6475
Nov. 5, 1990, 104 Stat. 2237, Pub. L. 101-518,§ 136